Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.170

Records.

(1) A licensee shall maintain the following records for determining its compliance with this chapter for at least five years:

(a) A general ledger posted at least monthly containing all assets, liabilities, capital, income, and expense accounts;

(b) Bank statements and bank reconciliation records;

(c) Monthly reports about permissible investments;

(d) A list of the last known names and addresses of all of the licensee's authorized delegates;

(e) Copies of all currency transaction reports and suspicious activity reports filed in compliance with RCW 19.230.180; and

(f) Any other records required in rule by the director.

(2) The items specified in subsection (1) of this section may be maintained in any form of record that is readily accessible to the director or the director's designee upon request.

(3) Records may be maintained outside this state if they are made accessible to the director on seven business days' notice that is sent in writing.

(4) All records maintained by the licensee are open to inspection by the director or the director's designee.

[ 2010 c 73 s 7; 2003 c 287 s 19.]